apertium-mar.mar.dix
		<pardef n="/नाही_आहे__vaux">

			<e r="LR">       	<p><l>नाहीत</l><r>नाही<s n="adj"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


			<e>       	<p><l>नव्हतो</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नव्हते</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नव्हतो</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>       	<p><l>नव्हतास</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">  <p><l>नव्हता</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नव्हतीस</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">  <p><l>नव्हती</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नव्हता</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>       	<p><l>नव्हता</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नव्हती</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नव्हते</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">  <p><l>नव्हतं</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नव्हते</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नव्हत्या</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नव्हती</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


			<e>       	<p><l>नसेन</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसू</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>       	<p><l>नसशील</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसाल</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>       	<p><l>नसेल</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसतील</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


			<e>       	<p><l>नसणार</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pros"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसणार</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pros"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसणार</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pros"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<!-- subjunctive -->
			<e>       	<p><l>नसावा</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसावी</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसावे</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>नसावेत</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसाव्या</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR"> 	<p><l>नसाव्यात</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			
			<e>       	<p><l>नसावा</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसावी</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसावे</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>नसावेत</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसाव्या</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR"> 	<p><l>नसाव्यात</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>       	<p><l>नसावा</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसावी</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसावे</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">  <p><l>नसावं</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>       	<p><l>नसावे</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>नसावेत</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसाव्या</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR"> 	<p><l>नसाव्यात</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसावी</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR"> 	<p><l>नसावीत</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vaux"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<!-- adverbial derivations (move?) (CHECK) -->
			<e>       	<p><l>नसून</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="adv"/><s n="compl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसताना</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="adv"/><s n="impf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसतांना</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="adv"/><s n="impf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसल्या</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vblex"/><s n="gna"/><s n="impf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit_vb"/></e>

			<!-- gerund -->
			<e>       	<p><l>नसल्या</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="perf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_verbal"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>नसल्या</l><r>नाही<s n="adv"/><j/>आहे<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="perf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_verbal_no_clit"/></e>

		<e lm=""><i/><par n="/नाही_आहे__vaux"/></e>
